Utah statutes.
67-11-1.   Declaration of policy.

In order to extend to employees of the state and its political subdivisions and to the dependents and survivors of such employees, the basic protection accorded to others by the old-age and survivors insurance system embodied in the Social Security Act, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the Legislature, subject to the limitations of this act, that such steps be taken as to provide such protection to employees of the state and its political subdivisions within the limitations permitted under the Social Security Act.



Amended by Chapter 184, 1973 General Session

